Colorado, session 2026A, SB121.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, 8-6-120 as follows:
8-6-120. Overtime wages for agricultural employees - definitions
- rules.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION:
(a) "AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYEE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 8-2-206 (1)(b).
(b) "AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 8-3-104 (1).
(c) "DECISION-MAKING MANAGER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
PRIMARILY ENGAGED IN AGRICULTURAL WORK WHO:
(I) IS PAID AT LEAST THE MINIMUM SALARY THRESHOLD FOR CERTAIN
EXEMPTIONS CONTAINED IN THE PROVISIONS CONCERNING AGRICULTURAL
WORKERS IN THE DIRECTOR'S RULES RELATED TO COLORADO OVERTIME AND
MINIMUM PAY STANDARDS;
(II) IS NOT EMPLOYED ON A SEASONAL OR TEMPORARY BASIS; AND
(III) HAS PRIMARY DUTIES THAT REQUIRE THE ROUTINE EXERCISE OF
INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT AND DISCRETION IN MATTERS OF SIGNIFICANCE
AND WHO EITHER:
(A) SUPERVISES TWO OR MORE FULL-TIME EMPLOYEES; OR
(B) REPORTS DIRECTLY TO AN OWNER OR TO AN EXECUTIVE-LEVEL
EMPLOYEE WHO REPORTS DIRECTLY TO AN OWNER WHO ROUTINELY
EXERCISES INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT AND DISCRETION IN MATTERS OF
SIGNIFICANCE IN MANUAL OR IN NONMANUAL LABOR.
(d) "FAMILY MEMBER" MEANS A CHILD, SIBLING, SPOUSE, PARENT,
AUNT, UNCLE, NEPHEW, NIECE, FIRST COUSIN, GRANDCHILD, OR
GRANDPARENT BY BLOOD, ADOPTION, OR MARRIAGE.
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, AN AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYER
SHALL PAY AN AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYEE AT AN OVERTIME RATE FOR ANY
TIME WORKED IN EXCESS OF FIFTY-SIX HOURS IN A WORKWEEK, EXCEPT FOR
AN AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYEE WHO IS:
(a) PRINCIPALLY ENGAGED IN THE RANGE PRODUCTION OF LIVESTOCK
ON THE OPEN RANGE, AS DESCRIBED IN 29 CFR 780.323 TO 780.329;
(b) A DECISION-MAKING MANAGER WHO IS EMPLOYED BY AN
AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYER; OR
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-121

(c) A FAMILY MEMBER OF A FAMILY OWNER OF AN AGRICULTURAL
EMPLOYER.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-4-113, amend
(1)(a)(I); and add (1)(a)(I.5)(E) and (1)(a)(I.5)(F) as follows:
8-4-113. Fines pursuant to enforcement - wage theft
enforcement fund - created - administrative lien and levy of employer
assets - wage claim payments from the fund - definition - rules.
(1) (a) (I) (A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I)(B) OF
THIS SECTION, if a case against an employer is enforced pursuant to section
8-4-111, any employer who without good faith legal justification fails to
pay the wages of each of the employer's employees shall forfeit to the
people of the state of Colorado a fine in an amount determined by the
director or hearing officer but no more than the sum of fifty dollars per day
for each such failure to pay each employee, commencing from the date that
such wages first became due and payable.
(B) FOR AN AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
8-3-104 (1), WHO, WITHOUT A GOOD FAITH LEGAL JUSTIFICATION, WILLFULLY
FAILS TO PAY THE WAGES OF EACH OF THE AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYER'S
EMPLOYEES AT LEAST THREE TIMES IN A FIVE-YEAR PERIOD, THE TOTAL
AMOUNT FORFEITED TO THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF COLORADO PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE INCREASED BY TEN
PERCENT.
(I.5) An employer found to have misclassified an employee as a
nonemployee in a way that may affect a wage and hour payment or
reporting obligation under a state, federal, or local law, rule, or regulation
shall pay a fine in the following amounts, increased by the director by rule
by January 1, 2028, and by rule by January 1 every other year based on the
prior two years' increase, if any, in the United States department of labor's
bureau of labor statistics consumer price index, or a successor index, for
Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for urban wage earners and clerical workers, per
employee, in addition to any other relief ordered:
(E) FOR AN AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
8-3-104 (1), WITH A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT WILLFUL VIOLATION WITHIN FIVE
YEARS, THE FINE UNDER SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I.5)(C) OF THIS SECTION IS
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-121

INCREASED BY TWENTY THOUSAND DOLLARS; AND
(F) FOR AN AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
8-3-104 (1), WITH A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT WILLFUL VIOLATION THAT IS NOT
REMEDIED WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE DIVISION'S FINDING, THE FINE
UNDER SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I.5)(D) OF THIS SECTION IS INCREASED BY FORTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS.
SECTION 3. Applicability. This act applies to time worked and
contracts entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-121

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-121